Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1827
Business enterprise; employment of persons committed to the department.

(1) The Director of Correctional Services may enter into such contracts as may be necessary to fully implement the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act. Such contractual arrangements may include, but not be limited to, rental or lease agreements for such buildings or portions thereof on the grounds of any Department of Correctional Services facilities, together with the real estate needed for reasonable access to and egress from the leased buildings, with a private corporation for the purpose of establishing and operating a factory for the manufacture and processing of goods, wares, or merchandise or any other business or commercial enterprise deemed by the director to be consistent with the proper training and rehabilitation of persons committed to the department.

(2) Nothing in this section shall operate to limit the director's authority to enter into contractual arrangements as may be provided elsewhere in law.

(3) Any corporation operating a factory or other business or commercial enterprise under this section may employ offenders committed to the Department of Correctional Services and persons conditionally released subject to the provisions of section 83-184.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 27;

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 27.